apertium-ky-kk.kk.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!   M O R P H O L O G I C A L · T R A N S D U C E R · F O R · K A Z A K H   !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Multichar_Symbols
 
%<n%>       ! Noun
%<np%>      ! Proper noun
%<v%>       ! Verb
%<prn%>     ! Pronoun 
%<num%>     ! Numeral
%<adj%>     ! Adjective
%<det%>     ! Determiner
%<adv%>     ! Adverb
%<post%>    ! Postposition
%<postadv%> ! Postadverb
%<abbr%>    ! Abbreviation
%<ij%>      ! Interjection 
%<cnjcoo%>  ! Co-ordinating conjunction
%<cop%>     ! Copula

%<pers%>    ! Personal
%<ord%>     ! Ordinal
%<itg%>     ! Interrogative
%<ref%>     ! Reflexive
%<ind%>     ! Indefinite

%<pst%>     ! positive
%<comp%>    ! comparative
%<coll%>    ! collective-numeral pronoun
%<recip%>   ! reciprocal pronoun
%<attr%>    ! used for KI

%<top%>     ! Toponym
%<ant%>     ! Anthroponym
%<cog%>     ! Cognomen

%<m%>       ! Masculine
%<f%>       ! Feminine

%<sg%>      ! Singular
%<pl%>      ! Plural

%<tv%>      ! Transitive
%<iv%>      ! Intransitive
%<TD%>      ! Temporary tag (unknown transitivity)

%<p1%>      ! First person 
%<p2%>      ! Second person 
%<p3%>      ! Third person 

%<px1sg%>   ! First person singular
%<px2sg%>   ! Second person singular
%<px3sp%>   ! Third person singular/plural
%<px1pl%>   ! First person plural
%<px2pl%>   ! Second person plural
%<px%>      ! General possessive -нікі
%<frm%>     ! formal address   ! FIXME: need better comment

%<prt_perf%> ! perfect participle
%<prt_plan%> ! plan participle
%<prt_cond%> ! conditional participle
%<prt_impf%> ! imperfect participle
%<prt_irre%> ! irrealis participle

%<ger_ppot%> ! gerund p??? potential
%<ger_past%> ! past/perfect gerund
%<ger_perf%> ! perfective gerund
%<ger_impf%> ! imperfective gerund
%<ger%>      ! just a gerund
%<ger_abs%>  ! absolute(?) gerund

%<vadj_fut%>  ! future verbal adjective
%<vadj_fut2%> ! another future verbal adjective
%<vadj_past%> ! past verbal adjective
%<vadj_impf%> ! imperfect verbal adjective
%<vadj_pot%>  ! potential verbal adjective

%<nom%>     ! Nominative
%<gen%>     ! Genitive
%<dat%>     ! Dative 
%<acc%>     ! Accusative 
%<loc%>     ! Locative 
%<abl%>     ! Ablative 
%<ins%>     ! Instrumental 

%<rloc%>    ! Relativised locative -DAGI
%<sim%>     ! Similative (<apprx> in kymorph)
%<reas%>    ! Reason

%<exi%>     ! Perfect participle
%<pfp%>     ! Perfect participle

%<ifi%>     ! eyewitness past
%<past%>    ! past
%<evid%>    ! evidential
%<aor%>     ! non-future

%<mod_qst%> ! Modal question partical
%<mod_foc%> ! focus thingy
%<mod_ass%> ! assertive

%<pass%>    ! passive

%<sent%>    ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>    ! Hyphen
%<cm%>      ! Comma
%<apos%>    ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>   ! Quote marker (right hand side) 
%<lquot%>   ! Quote marker (left hand side) 
%<rpar%>    ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side) 
%<lpar%>    ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side) 

%{L%}       ! Archiphoneme 'l': realised as л, д, т
%{N%}       ! Archiphoneme 'n': realised as н, д, т
%{M%}       ! Archiphoneme 'm': realised as м, б, п
%{G%}       ! Archiphoneme 'g': realised as к, қ, г, ғ
%{G%}       ! Archiphoneme 'k': realised as к, қ
%{D%}       ! Archiphoneme 'd': realised as д, т
%{A%}       ! Archiphoneme 'a': realsied as е, а
%{I%}       ! Archiphoneme 'i': realised as і, ы
%{S%}       ! Realised as 'с' or ''; only used in 3rd person morphology
%{n%}       ! Realised as 'н' or ''; only used in 3rd person morphology and -NIKI
%{l%}       ! Realised as 'л' or 'н'; only used in passive -{I}{l}
%{y%}       ! Realised as '' or '{I}'; only used in epenthesis for nouns
%{o%}       ! Realised as ''; triggers dialectal interpretation of Iп
%{E%}       ! Realised as 'а', 'е', 'й' (={A}/й)

LEXICON Root
NounStems ;
PropernounStems ;
VerbStems ;
AdjStems ;
AdvStems;
Conjunctionstems ;
PronounStems ;
PostpositionStems ;
Postadverbs ;
NumeralStems ;
Abbreviations ;
Determiners ;
Copula ;
Punctuation ;
Interjections ;

LEXICON CASE
%<nom%>: CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} CLIT ;
%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} CLIT ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<ins%>:%>%{M%}ен CLIT ;

LEXICON POSSESSION-ENDINGS  ! P_2
%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м CASE-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CASE-ETC ; 
%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CASE-ETC ; 
%<px3sp%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASE-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з CASE-ETC ; 
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ңд%{A%}р CASE-ETC ; 
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON VOL-ENDINGS
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}м # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң # ; 
%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з # ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з # ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ңд%{A%}р # ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} # ;

LEXICON CASE-ETC
CASE ;
GEN-POS ;
CLIT ;
%<adv%>:ш%{A%} # ; ! FIXME: might not be quite the right place

LEXICON POSSESSION
POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

LEXICON NP-Common
N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON 
POSSESSION ;
CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON ADJ-DAGI
!! ADJ-COMMON ;  !!!! ! FIXME: when we go recursive, use this instead of CASES
%<n%>: CASE ;
! ADJ-COMMON ;  !!!! ! FIXME: when we go recursive, use this instead of N-INFL
!%<n%>: N-INFL ;
%<adj%>%<pst%>: CLIT ;
# ;

LEXICON GEN-POS
%<px%>:%>%{N%}ікі%{n%} CASE ;
%<rloc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} ADJ-DAGI ;
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й ADJ-DAGI ;

LEXICON Ninfl

%<n%>: N-INFL-COMMON ;
!%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р N-INFL-COMMON ; ! FIXME: right?

LEXICON Natinfl

Adjinfl ;             ! nationality's adjectival form, e.g. "Turkish [food]"
Ninfl ;               ! a member of the nationality, e.g. "A Turk"
%>ш%{A%} Advinfl ;    ! as / in the style of the nat., e.g. "à la Turk"
%>ш%{A%} Advinfl ;    ! in the language of the nationality, e.g. "in Turkish"
%>ш%{A%} Ninfl ;      ! the language of the nationality, e.g. "Turkish"

LEXICON Matinfl
!! Materials that are always both nouns and adjectives
Adjinfl ;             !
Ninfl ;               !

LEXICON Numinfl

%<num%>: N-INFL-COMMON ; 
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON NumeralList

%0 NumeralLoop ;
1 NumeralLoop ;
2 NumeralLoop ;
3 NumeralLoop ;
4 NumeralLoop ;
5 NumeralLoop ;
6 NumeralLoop ;
7 NumeralLoop ;
8 NumeralLoop ;
9 NumeralLoop ;
%% NumeralLoop ;

LEXICON NumeralLoop
NumeralList ;
%. NumeralList  ;
%, NumeralList  ;
%. Numinfl ; ! Dir/RL
%, Numinfl ; ! Dir/RL
%%:%%%- Numinfl ;
:%- Numinfl ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<num%>: Numinfl ;

LEXICON Npinfl-Top

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-Common ;
%<adj%>%<top%>:%{L%}%{I%}%{K%} ADJ-COMMON ;  ! FIXME: do these tags make sense?

LEXICON Npinfl-Antm

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NP-Common ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-Common ;

LEXICON Npinfl-Antf

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NP-Common ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-Common ;

LEXICON Npinfl-Cogm

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-Common ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-Common ;

!FIXME
LEXICON V-PERS-PRES ! P_6
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н CLIT ;    ! Dir/LR
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з CLIT ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>д%{I%} CLIT-OTHER ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLIT-MA ; 
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>м%{I%}з CLIT ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}ңд%{A%}р CLIT ;  
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}зд%{A%}р CLIT ;  
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>д%{I%} CLIT-OTHER ; 
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%> CLIT-MA ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-COP ! P_3

%+е%<cop%>: V-PERS-COP-SUF ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-PAST ! P_4

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT ;  
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}%{K%} CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ңд%{A%}р CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLIT ;

LEXICON NounStems
ақпан Ninfl ; ! "february"
аспоп Ninfl ; ! "instrument"
байланыс Ninfl ; ! "connection"
биология Ninfl ; ! "biology"
ғұлама Ninfl ; ! "scholar"
дөнежін Ninfl ; ! "four year old female large livestock"
әңгіме Ninfl ; ! "story"
жай Ninfl ; ! "place,condition"
жел Ninfl ; ! "wind"
жүк Ninfl ; ! "load,baggage"
иықағаш Ninfl ; ! "hanger"
қайыр Ninfl ; ! "goodness"
қарыс Ninfl ; ! "span,distance between thumb and middle finger"
кәсер Ninfl ; ! "miserable"
көмек Ninfl ; ! "help"
қулық Ninfl ; ! "deceit"
қызғалдақ Ninfl ; ! "tulip"
маса Ninfl ; ! "mosquito"
нәтиже Ninfl ; ! "result"
пышақ Ninfl ; ! "knife"
сорпа Ninfl ; ! "soup"
тер Ninfl ; ! "sweat"
ұзындық Ninfl ; ! "length"
ши Ninfl ; ! "shaggy grass"
радио Ninfl ; ! "radio"
қазақ Natinfl ; ! "Kazakh"
қырғыз Natinfl ; ! "Kyrgyz"
моңғол Natinfl ; ! "Mongol"
түрік Natinfl ; ! "Turkish"
орыс Natinfl ; ! "Russian"
исраилдік Natinfl ; ! "Israelite"
Араб Natinfl ; ! "Arab"
Калмак Natinfl ; ! "Kalmyk" 
Неміс Natinfl ; ! "German"
чуваш Natinfl ; ! "Chuvash"
Негр Natinfl ; ! "Negro"
Чех Natinfl ; ! "Czech"
қытай Natinfl ; ! "Chinese"
өзбек Natinfl ; ! "Uzbek"
киіз Matinfl ; ! "felt"
күміс Matinfl ; ! "silver"
алтын Matinfl ; ! "gold"
жез Matinfl ; ! "copper"
LEXICON PropernounStems 
Австрия Npinfl-Top ; ! "Austria"
Алматы Npinfl-Top ; ! "Almaty"
Аргентина Npinfl-Top ; ! "Argentina"
Афина Npinfl-Top ; ! "Athens"
Бельгия Npinfl-Top ; ! "Belgium"
Британия Npinfl-Top ; ! "Britain"
Варшава Npinfl-Top ; ! "Warsaw"
Гана Npinfl-Top ; ! "Ghana"
Гренлаидия Npinfl-Top ; ! "Greenland"
Дублин Npinfl-Top ; ! "Dublin"
Жапония Npinfl-Top ; ! "Japan"
Иордания Npinfl-Top ; ! "Jordan"
Исландия Npinfl-Top ; ! "Iceland"
Қазақстан Npinfl-Top ; ! "Kazakhstan" 
Копенгаген Npinfl-Top ; ! "Copenhagen"
Қытай Npinfl-Top ; ! "China"
литвалық Npinfl-Top ; ! "Lithuanian"
Мексика Npinfl-Top ; ! "Mexico"
Өзбекстан Npinfl-Top ; ! "Uzbekistan" 
Прага Npinfl-Top ; ! "Prague"
Сьван Npinfl-Top ; ! "Gypsy"   ! FIXME: check
Ұдмұртстан Npinfl-Top ; ! "Udmurtia" 
Швеция Npinfl-Top ; ! "Sweden"
Шымкент Npinfl-Top ; ! "Shymkent"
Айбике Npinfl-Antf; ! "Aybıyke" (Kazakh)
Аймангүл Npinfl-Antf; ! "Aymangül" (Kazakh)
Айтқали Npinfl-Antm; ! "Aytqalıy" (Arabic)
Айымгүл Npinfl-Antf; ! "Ayımgül" (Kazakh)
Алмажан Npinfl-Antf; ! "Almajan" (Kazakh)
Анна Npinfl-Antf; ! "Anna" (Ancient Hebrew)
Ар Npinfl-Antm; ! "Ar" (Arabic)
Бағдат Npinfl-Antm; ! "Bağdat" (Arabic)
Бадиға Npinfl-Antf; ! "Badıyğa" (Arabic)
Бақталап Npinfl-Antm; ! "Baqtalap" (Kazakh)
Баян Npinfl-Antf; ! "Bayan" (Arabic)
Бекболат Npinfl-Antm; ! "Bekbolat" (Kazakh)
Бибигүл Npinfl-Antf; ! "Biybiygül" (Persian)
Бөжей Npinfl-Antm; ! "Böjey" (Old Turkic)
Виктория Npinfl-Antf; ! "Viktoriya" (Latin)
Ғаппар Npinfl-Antm; ! "Ğappar" (Arabic)
Гұлбану Npinfl-Antf; ! "Gulbanıw" (Arabic)
Гүлнара Npinfl-Antf; ! "Gülnara" (Arabic)
Данагүл Npinfl-Antf; ! "Danagül" (Persian)
Додабай Npinfl-Antm; ! "Dodabay" (Kazakh)
Әбілқасым Npinfl-Antm; ! "Äbilqasım" (Arabic)
Елдес Npinfl-Antm; ! "Eldes" (Kazakh)
Әлиша Npinfl-Antf; ! "Äliysha" 
Ердар Npinfl-Antm; ! "Erdar" (Arabic)
Есет Npinfl-Antm; ! "Eset" (Persian)
Жалғастұр Npinfl-Antm; ! "Jalğastur" (Kazakh)
Жанна Npinfl-Antf; ! "Janna" (Kazakh)
Жасыбай Npinfl-Antm; ! "Jasıbay" (Kazakh)
Жүсіпақын Npinfl-Antm; ! "Jüsipaqın" (Arabic)
Зила Npinfl-Antf; ! "Zıyla" (Arabic)
Қадыр Npinfl-Antm; ! "Qadır" (Arabic)
Қалтұрган Npinfl-Antf; ! "Qalturgan" 
Қасымқұл Npinfl-Antm; ! "Qasımqul" (Arabic)
Қолдас Npinfl-Antm; ! "Qoldas" (Kazakh)
Қымбат Npinfl-Antf; ! "Qımbat" (Kazakh)
Мейіз Npinfl-Antf; ! "Meyiz" (Kazakh)
Мизам Npinfl-Antm; ! "Mıyzam" (Arabic)
Нұрайша Npinfl-Antf; ! "Nuraysha" (Arabic)
Нұрбақ Npinfl-Antm; ! "Nurbaq" (Arabic)
Пазылбек Npinfl-Antm; ! "Pazılbek" (Arabic)
Парзан Npinfl-Antf; ! "Parzan" (Persian)
Сандуғаш Npinfl-Antf; ! "Sandıwğash" (Old Turkic)
Сейітжан Npinfl-Antm; ! "Seyitjan" (Arabic)
Тәбия Npinfl-Antf; ! "Täbıya" (Arabic)
Темірқан Npinfl-Antm; ! "Temirqan" (Kazakh)
Фариза Npinfl-Antf; ! "Fariza" (Arabic)
Шұғыла Npinfl-Antf; ! "Shuğıla" (Kazakh)
Петір Npinfl-Antm ; ! "Peter"
Тілешев Npinfl-Cogm ; ! "Tilešev"
Құнанбай Npinfl-Cogm ; ! "Qunanbay"
Назарбаев Npinfl-Cogm ; ! "Nazarbayev"
Бакиев Npinfl-Cogm ; ! "Bakiyev"
Обама Npinfl-Cogm ; ! "Obama"  ! FIXME: Cogmf
Путин Npinfl-Cogm ; ! "Putin"
Медведев Npinfl-Cogm ; ! "Medvedev"
